Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Chapter 2

Tennessee Egg Law [Repealed.]

53-2-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 2; 1953, ch. 98, § 1 (Williams, § 6579.30); 1961, ch. 20, § 1; 1981, ch. 322, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-202; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 3 (Williams, § 6579.31); 1959, ch. 117, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-203; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 4 (Williams, § 6579.32); 1981, ch. 322, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-204; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 5 (Williams, § 6579.33); 1959, ch. 117, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-205; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 6; 1953, ch. 98, § 2 (Williams, § 6579.34); 1959, ch. 117, § 3; 1961, ch. 20, § 2; 1981, ch. 322, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-206; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 589, § 1, effective March 10, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

Former § 53-2-106, concerned the fancy fresh egg marketing program, and was previously repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 589, § 1, effective March 10, 2016.

53-2-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 7 (Williams, § 6579.35); 1955, ch. 9, § 1; 1981, ch. 322, §§ 6, 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-207; Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 4; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-108. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 7; 1953, ch. 98, § 3 (Williams, § 6579.35); 1981, ch. 322, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-208; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-109. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 7; 1953, ch. 98, § 3 (Williams, § 6579.35); 1955, ch. 9, § 2; 1981, ch. 322, § 9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-209; Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 32; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-110. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 7 (Williams, § 6579.35); 1981, ch. 322, § 10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-210; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-111. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 7 (Williams, § 6579.35); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-211; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-112. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 8 (Williams, § 6579.36); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-212; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-113. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 9 (Williams, § 6579.37); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-213; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-114. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 10 (Williams, § 6579.38); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-214; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-115. [Repealed.]

Acts 1951, ch. 124, § 12 (Williams, § 6579.39); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-215; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.

53-2-116. [Repealed.]

Acts 2011, ch. 388, § 1; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 2, effective June 22, 2020.

Former title 53, ch. 2, §§ 53-2-101 — 53-2-116 concerned the Tennessee Egg Law.